California statutes. Penal Code
(7) Whether the witness has disclosed information concerning the case to the public through press conferences, public meetings, or other means.

(8) Other factors the court may deem necessary to protect the interests of justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 823, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

859.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a custodial interrogation of any person, including an adult or a minor, who is in a fixed place of detention, and suspected of committing murder, as listed in Section 187 or 189 of this code, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be electronically recorded in its entirety. A statement that is electronically recorded as required pursuant to this section creates a rebuttable presumption that the electronically recorded statement was, in fact, given and was accurately recorded by the prosecution’s witnesses, provided that the electronic recording was made of the custodial interrogation in its entirety and the statement is otherwise
 admissible.

(b) The requirement for the electronic recordation of a custodial interrogation pursuant to this section shall not apply under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Electronic recording is not feasible because of exigent circumstances. An explanation of the exigent circumstances shall be documented in the police report.

(2) The person to be interrogated
 states that he or she will speak to a law enforcement officer only if the interrogation is not electronically recorded. If feasible, that statement shall be electronically recorded. The requirement also does not apply if the person being interrogated indicates during interrogation that he or she will not participate in further interrogation unless electronic recording ceases. If the person being interrogated refuses to record any statement, the officer shall document that refusal in writing.

(3) The custodial interrogation occurred in another jurisdiction and was conducted by law enforcement officers of that jurisdiction in compliance with the law of that jurisdiction,
 unless the interrogation was conducted with intent to avoid the requirements of this section.

(4) The interrogation occurs when no law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation has knowledge of facts and circumstances that would lead an officer to reasonably believe that the individual being interrogated may have committed murder for which this section requires that a custodial interrogation be recorded. If during a custodial interrogation, the individual reveals facts and circumstances giving a law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation reason to believe that murder has
 been committed, continued custodial interrogation concerning that offense shall be electronically recorded pursuant to this section.

(5) A law enforcement officer conducting the interrogation or the officer’s superior reasonably believes that electronic recording would disclose the identity of a confidential informant or jeopardize the safety of an officer, the individual being interrogated, or another individual. An explanation of the circumstances shall be documented in the police report.

(6) The failure to create an electronic recording of the entire custodial interrogation was the result of
 a malfunction of the recording device, despite reasonable maintenance of the equipment, and timely repair or replacement was not feasible.

(7) The questions presented to a person by law enforcement personnel and the person’s responsive statements were part of a routine processing or booking of that person. Electronic recording is not required for spontaneous statements made in response to questions asked during the routine processing of the arrest of the person.

(8) The interrogation of a person who is in custody on a charge of a violation of Section 187 or 189 of this code or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code if the interrogation is not related to any of these offenses. If, during the
 interrogation, any information concerning one of these offenses is raised or mentioned, continued custodial interrogation concerning that offense shall be electronically recorded pursuant to this section.

(c) If the prosecution relies on an exception in subdivision (b) to justify a failure to make an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation, the prosecution shall show by clear and convincing evidence that the exception applies.

(d) A person’s statements that were not electronically recorded pursuant to this section may be admitted into evidence in a criminal proceeding or in a juvenile court proceeding, as applicable, if the court finds that all of the following apply:

(1) The statements are admissible under
 applicable rules of evidence.

(2) The prosecution has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the statements were made voluntarily.

(3) Law enforcement personnel made a contemporaneous audio or audio and visual recording of the reason for not making an electronic recording of the statements. This provision does not apply if it was not feasible for law enforcement personnel to make that recording.

(4) The prosecution has proven by clear and convincing evidence that one or more of the circumstances described in subdivision (b) existed at the time of the custodial interrogation.

(e) Unless the court finds that an exception in subdivision (b) applies,
 all of the following remedies shall be granted as relief for noncompliance:

(1) Failure to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall be considered by the court in adjudicating motions to suppress a statement of a defendant made during or after a custodial interrogation.

(2) Failure to comply with any of the requirements of this section shall be admissible in support of claims that a defendant’s statement was involuntary or is unreliable, provided the evidence is otherwise admissible.

(3) If the court finds that a defendant was subject to a custodial interrogation in violation of subdivision (a), the court shall provide the jury with an instruction, to be developed by the Judicial Council, that
 advises the jury to view with caution the statements made in that custodial interrogation.

(f) The interrogating entity shall maintain the original or an exact copy of an electronic recording made of a custodial interrogation until a conviction for any offense relating to the interrogation is final and all direct and habeas corpus appeals are exhausted or the prosecution for that offense is barred by law or, in a juvenile court proceeding, as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 626.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The interrogating entity may make one or more true, accurate, and complete copies of the electronic recording in a different format.

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Custodial interrogation” means any interrogation in a fixed place of detention involving a law enforcement officer’s questioning that is reasonably likely to elicit incriminating responses, and in which a reasonable person in the subject’s position would consider himself or herself to be in custody, beginning when a person should have been advised of his or her constitutional rights, including the right to remain silent, the right to have counsel present during any interrogation, and the right to have counsel appointed if the person is unable to afford counsel, and ending when the questioning has completely finished.

(2) (A) For the purposes of the custodial interrogation of a minor, pursuant to subdivision
 (a) or (b), “electronically recorded,” “electronic recordation,” and “electronic recording” refer to a video recording that accurately records a custodial interrogation.

(B) For the purposes of the custodial interrogation of an adult, pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), “electronically recorded,” “electronic recordation,”
 and “electronic recording”
 refer to a video or audio recording that accurately records a custodial interrogation. The Legislature encourages law enforcement agencies to use video recording when available.

(3) “Fixed place of detention” means a fixed location under the control of a law enforcement agency where an individual is held in detention in connection with a criminal offense that has been, or may be, filed against that person, including a jail, police or sheriff’s station, holding cell, correctional or detention facility, juvenile hall, or a facility of the Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(4) “Law enforcement officer” means a person employed by a law enforcement agency
 whose duties include enforcing criminal laws or investigating criminal activity, or any other person who is acting at the request or direction of that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 791, Sec. 2.   (SB 1389)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

859.7.

(a) All law enforcement agencies and prosecutorial entities shall adopt regulations for conducting photo lineups and live lineups with eyewitnesses. The regulations shall be developed to ensure reliable and accurate suspect identifications. In order to ensure reliability and accuracy, the regulations shall comply with, at a minimum, the following requirements:

(1) Prior to conducting the identification procedure, and as close in time to the incident as possible, the eyewitness shall provide the description of the perpetrator of the offense.

(2) The investigator conducting the identification procedure shall use blind administration or blinded administration during the identification
 procedure.

(3) The investigator shall state in writing the reason that the presentation of the lineup was not conducted using blind administration, if applicable.

(4) An eyewitness shall be instructed of the following, prior to any identification procedure:

(A) The perpetrator may or may not be among the persons in the identification procedure.

(B) The eyewitness should not feel compelled to make an identification.

(C) An identification or failure to make an identification will not end the investigation.

(5) An identification procedure shall be composed so that the fillers generally fit the eyewitness’ description of the
 perpetrator. In the case of a photo lineup, the photograph of the person suspected as the perpetrator should, if practicable, resemble his or her appearance at the time of the offense and not unduly stand out.

(6) In a photo lineup, writings or information concerning any previous arrest of the person suspected as the perpetrator shall not be visible to the eyewitness.

(7) Only one suspected perpetrator shall be included in any identification procedure.

(8) All eyewitnesses shall be separated when viewing an identification procedure.

(9) Nothing shall be said to the eyewitness that might influence the eyewitness’ identification of the person suspected as the perpetrator.

(10) If the
 eyewitness identifies a person he or she believes to be the perpetrator, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The investigator shall immediately inquire as to the eyewitness’ confidence level in the accuracy of the identification and record in writing, verbatim, what the eyewitness says.

(B) Information concerning the identified person shall not be given to the eyewitness prior to obtaining the eyewitness’ statement of confidence level and documenting the exact words of the eyewitness.

(C) The officer shall not validate or invalidate the eyewitness’ identification.

(11) An electronic recording shall be made that includes both audio and visual representations of the identification procedures. Whether it is feasible to make a recording with both audio
 and visual representations shall be determined on a case-by-case basis. When it is not feasible to make a recording with both audio and visual representations, audio recording may be used. When audio recording without video recording is used, the investigator shall state in writing the reason that video recording was not feasible.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to affect policies for field show up procedures.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Blind administration” means the administrator of an eyewitness identification procedure does not know the identity of the suspect.

(2) “Blinded administration” means the administrator of an eyewitness identification procedure may know who the suspect
 is, but does not know where the suspect, or his or her photo, as applicable, has been placed or positioned in the identification procedure through the use of any of the following:

(A) An automated computer program that prevents the administrator from seeing which photos the eyewitness is viewing until after the identification procedure is completed.

(B) The folder shuffle method, which refers to a system for conducting a photo lineup by placing photographs in folders, randomly numbering the folders, shuffling the folders, and then presenting the folders sequentially so that the administrator cannot see or track which photograph is being presented to the eyewitness until after the procedure is completed.

(C) Any other procedure that achieves neutral administration and prevents the lineup administrator from knowing
 where the suspect or his or her photo, as applicable, has been placed or positioned in the identification procedure.

(3) “Eyewitness” means a person whose identification of another person may be relevant in a criminal investigation.

(4) “Field show up” means a procedure in which a suspect is detained shortly after the commission of a crime and who, based on his or her appearance, his or her distance from the crime scene, or other circumstantial evidence, is suspected of having just committed a crime. In these situations, the victim or an eyewitness is brought to the scene of the detention and is asked if the detainee was the perpetrator.

(5) “Filler” means either a person or a photograph of a person who is not suspected of an offense and is included in an identification procedure.

(6) “Identification procedure” means either a photo lineup or a live lineup.

(7) “Investigator” means the person conducting the identification procedure.

(8) “Live lineup” means a procedure in which a group of persons, including the person suspected as the perpetrator of an offense and other persons not suspected of the offense, are displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of determining whether the eyewitness is able to identify the suspect as the perpetrator.

(9) “Photo lineup” means a procedure in which an array of photographs, including a photograph of the person suspected as the perpetrator of an offense and additional photographs of other persons not suspected of the offense, are displayed to an eyewitness for the purpose of determining whether the
 eyewitness is able to identify the suspect as the perpetrator.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to preclude the admissibility of any relevant evidence or to affect the standards governing the admissibility of evidence under the United States Constitution.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 977, Sec. 2.   (SB 923)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

859a.

(a) If the public offense charged is a felony not punishable with death, the magistrate shall immediately upon the appearance of counsel for the defendant read the complaint to the defendant and ask him or her whether he or she pleads guilty or not guilty to the offense charged therein and to a previous conviction or convictions of crime if charged. While the charge remains pending before the magistrate and when the defendant’s counsel is present, the defendant may plead guilty to the offense charged, or, with the consent of the magistrate and the district attorney or other counsel for the people, plead nolo contendere to the offense charged or plead guilty or nolo contendere to any other offense the commission of which is necessarily included in that with which he or she is charged, or to an attempt to commit the offense charged and to the previous conviction or convictions of crime if charged upon a plea of guilty or nolo contendere. The magistrate may then fix a reasonable bail as provided by this code, and upon failure to deposit the bail or surety, shall immediately commit the defendant to the sheriff. Upon accepting the plea of guilty or nolo contendere the magistrate shall certify the case, including a copy of all proceedings therein and any testimony that in his or her discretion he or she may require to be taken, to the court in which judgment is to be pronounced at the time specified under subdivision (b), and thereupon the proceedings shall be had as if the defendant had pleaded guilty in that court. This subdivision shall not be construed to authorize the receiving of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere from any defendant not represented by counsel. If the defendant subsequently files a written motion to withdraw the plea under Section 1018, the motion shall be heard and determined by the court before which the plea was entered.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 1191 or 1203, the magistrate shall, upon the receipt of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere and upon the performance of the other duties of the magistrate under this section, immediately appoint a time for pronouncing judgment in the superior court and refer the case to the probation officer if eligible for probation, as prescribed in Section 1191.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 533.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

859b.

At the time the defendant appears before the magistrate for arraignment, if the public offense is a felony to which the defendant has not pleaded guilty in accordance with Section 859a, the magistrate, immediately upon the appearance of counsel, or if none appears, after waiting a reasonable time therefor as provided in Section 859, shall set a time for the examination of the case and shall allow not less than two days, excluding Sundays and holidays, for the district attorney and the defendant to prepare for the examination. The magistrate shall also issue subpoenas, duly subscribed, for witnesses within the state, required either by the prosecution or the defense.

Both the defendant and the people have the right to a preliminary examination at the earliest possible time, and unless both waive that right or good cause for a continuance is found as provided for in Section 1050, the preliminary examination shall be held within 10 court days of the date the defendant is arraigned or pleads, whichever occurs later, or within 10 court days of the date criminal proceedings are reinstated pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2.

Whenever the defendant is in custody, the magistrate shall dismiss the complaint if the preliminary examination is set or continued beyond 10 court days from the time of the arraignment, plea, or reinstatement of criminal proceedings pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2, and the defendant has remained in custody for 10 or more court days solely on that complaint, unless either of the following occur:

(a) The defendant personally waives his or her right to preliminary examination within the 10 court days.

(b) The prosecution establishes good cause for a continuance beyond the 10-court-day period.

For purposes of this subdivision, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, those cases involving allegations that a violation of one or more of the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 11165.1 or in Section 11165.6 has occurred and the prosecuting attorney assigned to the case has another trial, preliminary hearing, or motion to suppress in progress in that court or another court. Any continuance under this paragraph shall be limited to a maximum of three additional court days.

If the preliminary examination is set or continued beyond the 10-court-day period, the defendant shall be released pursuant to Section 1318 unless:

(1) The defendant requests the setting of continuance of the preliminary examination beyond the 10-court-day period.

(2) The defendant is charged with a capital offense in a cause where the proof is evident and the presumption great.

(3) A witness necessary for the preliminary examination is unavailable due to the actions of the defendant.

(4) The illness of counsel.

(5) The unexpected engagement of counsel in a jury trial.

(6) Unforeseen conflicts of interest which require appointment of new counsel.

The magistrate shall dismiss the complaint if the preliminary examination is set or continued more than 60 days from the date of the arraignment, plea, or reinstatement of criminal proceedings pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2, unless the defendant personally waives his or her right to a preliminary examination within the 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

859c.

Procedures under this code that provide for superior court review of a challenged ruling or order made by a superior court judge or a magistrate shall be performed by a superior court judge other than the judge or magistrate who originally made the ruling or order, unless agreed to by the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 370.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

860.

At the time set for the examination of the case, if the public offense is a felony punishable with death, or is a felony to which the defendant has not pleaded guilty in accordance with Section 859a of this code, then, if the defendant requires the aid of counsel, the magistrate must allow the defendant a reasonable time to send for counsel, and may postpone the examination for not less than two nor more than five days for that purpose. The magistrate must, immediately after the appearance of counsel, or if, after waiting a reasonable time therefor, none appears, proceed to examine the case; provided, however, that a defendant represented by counsel may when brought before the magistrate as provided in Section 858 or at any time subsequent thereto, waive the right to an examination before such magistrate, and thereupon it shall be the duty of the magistrate to make an order holding the defendant to answer, and it shall be the duty of the district attorney within 15 days thereafter, to file in the superior court of the county in which the offense is triable the information; provided, further, however, that nothing contained herein shall prevent the district attorney nor the magistrate from requiring that an examination be held as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 371.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

861.

(a) The preliminary examination shall be completed at one session or the complaint shall be dismissed, unless the magistrate, for good cause shown by affidavit, postpones it. The postponement shall not be for more than 10 court days, unless either of the following occur:

(1) The defendant personally waives his or her right to a continuous preliminary examination.

(2) The prosecution establishes good cause for a postponement beyond the 10-court-day period. If the magistrate postpones the preliminary examination beyond the 10-court-day period, and the defendant is in custody, the defendant shall be released pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 859b.

(b) The preliminary examination shall not be postponed beyond 60 days from the date the motion to postpone the examination is granted, unless by consent or on motion of the defendant.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the magistrate from interrupting the preliminary examination to conduct brief court matters so long as a substantial majority of the court’s time is devoted to the preliminary examination.

(d) A request for a continuance of the preliminary examination that is made by the defendant or his or her attorney of record for the purpose of filing a motion pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 1538.5 shall be deemed a personal waiver of the defendant’s right to a continuous preliminary examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

861.5.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 861, the magistrate may postpone the preliminary examination for one court day in order to accommodate the special physical, mental, or emotional needs of a child witness who is 10 years of age or younger or a dependent person, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 288.

The magistrate shall admonish both the prosecution and defense against coaching the witness prior to the witness’ next appearance in the preliminary examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 279, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

If a postponement is had, the magistrate must commit the defendant for examination, admit him to bail or discharge him from custody upon the deposit of money as provided in this Code, as security for his appearance at the time to which the examination is postponed.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

The commitment for examination is made by an indorsement, signed by the magistrate on the warrant of arrest, to the following effect: “The within named A.B. having been brought before me under this warrant, is committed for examination to the Sheriff of ____.” If the Sheriff is not present, the defendant may be committed to the custody of a peace officer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

At the examination, the magistrate must first read to the defendant the depositions of the witnesses examined on taking the information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1174.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

The witnesses must be examined in the presence of the defendant, and may be cross-examined in his behalf.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

(a) When the examination of witnesses on the part of the people is closed, any witness the defendant may produce shall be sworn and examined.

Upon the request of the prosecuting attorney, the magistrate shall require an offer of proof from the defense as to the testimony expected from the witness. The magistrate shall not permit the testimony of any defense witness unless the offer of proof discloses to the satisfaction of the magistrate, in his or her sound discretion, that the testimony of that witness, if believed, would be reasonably likely to establish an affirmative defense, negate an element of a crime charged, or impeach the testimony of a prosecution witness or the statement of a declarant testified to by a prosecution witness.

(b) It is the purpose of a preliminary examination to establish whether there exists probable cause to believe that the defendant has committed a felony. The examination shall not be used for purposes of discovery.

(c) This section shall not be construed to compel or authorize the taking of depositions of witnesses.

(History: Amended June 5, 1990, by initiative Proposition 115, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

866.5.

The defendant may not be examined at the examination, unless he is represented by counsel, or unless he waives his right to counsel after being advised at such examination of his right to aid of counsel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1482.)
-------------------------------------------

867.

While a witness is under examination, the magistrate shall, upon motion of either party, exclude all potential and actual witness who have not been examined.

The magistrate shall also order the witnesses not to converse with each other until they are all examined. The magistrate may also order, where feasible, that the witnesses be kept separated from each other until they are all examined. 

This section does not apply to the investigating officer or the investigator for the defendant, nor does it apply to officers having custody of persons brought before the magistrate.

Either party may challenge the exclusion of any person under this section. Upon motion of either party, the magistrate shall hold a hearing, on the record, to determine if the person sought to be excluded is, in fact, a person excludable under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

868.

The examination shall be open and public. However, upon the request of the defendant and a finding by the magistrate that exclusion of the public is necessary in order to protect the defendant’s right to a fair and impartial trial, the magistrate shall exclude from the examination every person except the clerk, court reporter and bailiff, the prosecutor and his or her counsel, the Attorney General, the district attorney of the county, the investigating officer, the officer having custody of a prisoner witness while the prisoner is testifying, the defendant and his or her counsel, the officer having the defendant in custody, and a person chosen by the prosecuting witness who is not himself or herself a witness but who is present to provide the prosecuting witness moral support, provided that the person so chosen shall not discuss prior to or during the preliminary examination the testimony of the prosecuting witness with any person, other than the prosecuting witness, who is a witness in the examination. Upon motion of the prosecution, members of the alleged victim’s family shall be entitled to be present and seated during the examination. The court shall grant the motion unless the magistrate finds that the exclusion is necessary to protect the defendant’s right to a fair and impartial trial, or unless information provided by the defendant or noticed by the court establishes that there is a reasonable likelihood that the attendance of members of the alleged victim’s family poses a risk of affecting the content of the testimony of the victim or any other witness. The court shall admonish members of the alleged victim’s family who are present and seated during the examination not to discuss any testimony with family members, witnesses, or the public. Nothing in this section shall affect the exclusion of witnesses as provided in Section 867 of the Penal Code.

For purposes of this section, members of the alleged victim’s family shall include the alleged victim’s spouse, parents, legal guardian, children, or siblings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

868.4.

(a) If requested by either party in a criminal or juvenile hearing, and if a therapy or facility dog is available to the party within the jurisdiction of the judicial district in which the case is being adjudicated, the following individuals shall be afforded the opportunity to have a therapy or facility dog accompany him or her while testifying in court, subject to the approval of the court:

(1) A child witness in a court proceeding involving any serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, or any violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(2) A victim who is entitled to support persons pursuant to Section 868.5, in addition to any support
 persons selected pursuant to that section.

(b) Before a therapy or facility dog may be used pursuant to subdivision (a), the party seeking to utilize the therapy or facility dog shall file a motion with the court, which shall include the following: 

(1) The training or credentials of the therapy or facility dog.

(2) The training of the therapy or facility dog handler.

(3) Facts justifying that the presence of the therapy or facility dog may reduce anxiety or otherwise be helpful to the witness while testifying.

(c) If a party, pursuant to subdivision (b), makes a showing that the therapy or facility dog and handler are suitably qualified and will reasonably assist the testifying witness,
 the court may grant the motion, unless the court finds the use of a therapy or facility dog would cause undue prejudice to the defendant or would be unduly disruptive to the court proceeding.

(d) The court shall take appropriate measures to make the presence of the therapy or facility dog as unobtrusive and nondisruptive as possible, including requiring the dog to be accompanied by a handler in the courtroom at all times.

(e) If a therapy or facility dog is used during a criminal jury trial, the court shall, upon request, issue an appropriate jury instruction designed to prevent prejudice for or against any party.

(f) This section does not prevent the court from removing or excluding a therapy or facility dog from the courtroom to maintain order or to ensure the fair presentation of evidence, as stated on the
 record.

(g) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in adding this section to codify the holding in People v. Chenault (2014) 227 Cal.App.4th 1503 with respect to allowing an individual witness to have a support dog accompany him or her when testifying in proceedings as provided in subdivision (a).

(2) Nothing in this section abrogates the holding in People v. Chenault regarding the need to present appropriate jury instructions.

(3) Nothing in this section limits the use of a service dog, as defined in Section 54.1 of the Civil Code, by a person with a disability.

(h) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Child witness” means any witness
 who is under the age of 18 at the time he or she testifies.

(2) “Facility dog” means a dog that has successfully completed a training program in providing emotional comfort in a high-stress environment for the purpose of enhancing the ability of a witness to speak in a judicial proceeding and reducing his or her stress level, provided by an assistance dog organization accredited by Assistance Dogs International or a similar nonprofit organization that sets standards of training for dogs, and that has passed a public access test for service animals.

(3) “Handler” means a person who has successfully completed training on offering an animal for assistance purposes from an organization accredited by Assistance Dogs International, Therapy Dogs Incorporated, or a similar nonprofit organization, and has received additional training on policies and protocols of the court and the
 responsibilities of a courtroom dog handler.

(4) “Therapy dog” means a dog that has successfully completed training, certification, or evaluation in providing emotional support therapy in settings including, but not limited to, hospitals, nursing homes, and schools, provided by the American Kennel Club, Therapy Dogs Incorporated, or a similar nonprofit organization, and has been performing the duties of a therapy dog for not less than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 290, Sec. 1.   (AB 411)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

868.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a prosecuting witness in a case involving a violation or attempted violation of Section 187, 203, 205, or 207, subdivision (b) of Section 209, Section 211, 215, 220, 236.1, 240, 242, 243.4, 245, 261, 266, 266a, 266b, 266c, 266d, 266e, 266f, 266g, 266h, 266i, 266j, 266k, 267, 269, 273a, 273d, 273.5, 273.6, 278, 278.5, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 288.7, 289, 311.1, 311.2, 311.3, 311.4, 311.5, 311.6, 311.10, 311.11, 422, 646.9, or 647.6, former Section 262, 277, 288a, or 647a, subdivision (1) of Section 314, or subdivision (b), (d), or (e) of Section 368 when the prosecuting witness is the elder or dependent adult, shall be entitled, for support, to the attendance of up to two persons of the prosecuting witness’ own choosing, one of whom may be a witness, at the preliminary hearing and at the trial,
 or at a juvenile court proceeding, during the testimony of the prosecuting witness. Only one of those support persons may accompany the witness to the witness stand, although the other may remain in the courtroom during the witness’ testimony. The person or persons so chosen shall not be a person described in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code unless the person or persons are related to the prosecuting witness as a parent, guardian, or sibling and do not make notes during the hearing or proceeding.

(b) If the person or persons so chosen are also witnesses, the prosecution shall present evidence that the person’s attendance is both desired by the prosecuting witness for support and will be helpful to the prosecuting witness. Upon that showing, the court shall grant the request unless information presented by the defendant or noticed by the court establishes that the support person’s attendance during the testimony of the prosecuting witness would
 pose a substantial risk of influencing or affecting the content of that testimony. In the case of a juvenile court proceeding, the judge shall inform the support person or persons that juvenile court proceedings are confidential and may not be discussed with anyone not in attendance at the proceedings. In all cases, the judge shall admonish the support person or persons to not prompt, sway, or influence the witness in any way. This section does not preclude a court from exercising its discretion to remove a person from the courtroom whom it believes is prompting, swaying, or influencing the witness.

(c) The testimony of the person or persons so chosen who are also witnesses shall be presented before the testimony of the prosecuting witness. The prosecuting witness shall be excluded from the courtroom during that testimony. Whenever the evidence given by that person or those persons would be subject to exclusion because it has been given before
 the corpus delicti has been established, the evidence shall be admitted subject to the court’s or the defendant’s motion to strike that evidence from the record if the corpus delicti is not later established by the testimony of the prosecuting witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 39.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

868.6.

(a) It is the purpose of this section to provide a nonthreatening environment for minors involved in the judicial system in order to better enable them to speak freely and accurately of the experiences that are the subject of judicial inquiry.

(b) Each county is encouraged to provide a room, located within, or within a reasonable distance from, the courthouse, for the use of minors under the age of 16. Should any such room reach full occupancy, preference shall be given to minors under the age of 16 whose appearance has been subpoenaed by the court. The room may be multipurpose in character. The county may seek the assistance of civic groups in the furnishing of the room and the provision of volunteers to aid in its operation and maintenance. If a county newly constructs, substantially remodels or refurbishes any courthouse or facility used as a courthouse on or after January 1, 1988, that courthouse or facility shall contain the room described in this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 976, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

868.7.
